Missouri, session 2026, HB3220.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 302.130, 302.171, 302.178, and 302.302, RSMo, are repealed
and seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 302.130, 302.171,
302.178, 302.212, 302.214, 302.216, and 302.302, to read as follows:
302.130. 1. Any person at least fifteen years of age who, except for age or lack of
instruction in operating a motor vehicle, would otherwise be qualified to obtain a license
pursuant to sections 302.010 to 302.340 may apply for and the director shall issue a
temporary instruction permit entitling the applicant, while having such permit in the
applicant's immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle of the appropriate class upon the
highways for a period of twelve months, but any such person, except when operating a
motorcycle or motortricycle, must be accompanied by a licensed operator for the type of
motor vehicle being operated who is actually occupying a seat beside the driver for the
purpose of giving instruction in driving the motor vehicle, who is at least twenty-one years of
age, and in the case of any driver under sixteen years of age, the licensed operator occupying
the seat beside the driver shall be a grandparent, parent, guardian, a person who is at least
twenty-five years of age who has been licensed for a minimum of three years and has received
written permission from the parent or legal guardian to escort or accompany the driver, a
driver training instructor holding a valid driver education endorsement on a teaching
certificate issued by the department of elementary and secondary education or a qualified
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3220 2
instructor of a private drivers' education program who has a valid driver's license. An
applicant for a temporary instruction permit shall successfully complete a vision test and a
test of the applicant's ability to understand highway signs which regulate, warn or direct
traffic and practical knowledge of the traffic laws of this state, pursuant to section 302.173.
In addition, beginning January 1, 2007, no permit shall be granted pursuant to this subsection
unless a parent or legal guardian gives written permission by signing the application and in so
signing, state they, or their designee as set forth in subsection 2 of this section, will provide
and documenta minimum of forty hours of behind-the-wheel driving instruction, including a
minimum of ten hours of behind-the-wheel driving instruction that occurs during the
nighttime hours falling between sunset and sunrise. The forty hours of behind-the-wheel
driving instruction that is completed pursuant to this subsection may include any time that the
holder of an instruction permit has spent operating a motor vehicle in a driver training
program taught by a driver training instructor holding a valid driver education endorsement
on a teaching certificate issued by the department of elementary and secondary education or
by a qualified instructor of a private drivers' education program. If the applicant for a permit
is enrolled in a federal residential job training program, the instructor, as defined in
subsection 5 of this section, is authorized to sign the application stating that the applicant will
receive the behind-the-wheel driving instruction required by this section.
2. In the event the parent, grandparent or guardian of the person under sixteen years
of age has a physical disability which prohibits or disqualifies said parent, grandparent or
guardian from being a qualified licensed operator pursuant to this section, said parent,
grandparent or guardian may designate a maximum of two individuals authorized to
accompany the applicant for the purpose of giving instruction in driving the motor vehicle.
An authorized designee must be a licensed operator for the type of motor vehicle being
operated and have attained twenty-one years of age. At least one of the designees must
occupy the seat beside the applicant while giving instruction in driving the motor vehicle.
The name of the authorized designees must be provided to the department of revenue by the
parent, grandparent or guardian at the time of application for the temporary instruction
permit. The name of each authorized designee shall be printed on the temporary instruction
permit, however, the director may delay the time at which permits are printed bearing such
names until the inventories of blank permits and related forms existing on August 28, 1998,
are exhausted.
3. The director, upon proper application on a form prescribed by the director, in his or
her discretion, may issue a restricted instruction permit effective for a school year or more
restricted period to an applicant who is enrolled in a high school driver training program
taught by a driver training instructor holding a valid driver education endorsement on a
teaching certificate issued by the state department of elementary and secondary education

HB 3220 3
even though the applicant has not reached the age of sixteen years but has passed the age of
fifteen years. Such instruction permit shall entitle the applicant, when the applicant has such
permit in his or her immediate possession, to operate a motor vehicle on the highways, but
only when a driver training instructor holding a valid driver education endorsement on a
teaching certificate issued by the state department of elementary and secondary education is
occupying a seat beside the driver.
4. The director, in his or her discretion, may issue a temporary driver's permit to an
applicant who is otherwise qualified for a license permitting the applicant to operate a motor
vehicle while the director is completing the director's investigation and determination of all
facts relative to such applicant's rights to receive a license. Such permit must be in the
applicant's immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle, and it shall be invalid
when the applicant's license has been issued or for good cause has been refused.
5. In the event that the applicant for a temporary instruction permit described in
subsection 1 of this section is a participant in a federal residential job training program, the
permittee may operate a motor vehicle accompanied by a driver training instructor who holds
a valid driver education endorsement issued by the department of elementary and secondary
education and a valid driver's license.
6. A person at least fifteen years of age may operate a motor vehicle as part of a
driver training program taught by a driver training instructor holding a valid driver education
endorsement on a teaching certificate issued by the department of elementary and secondary
education or a qualified instructor of a private drivers' education program.
7. Beginning January 1, 2003, the director shall issue with every temporary
instruction permit issued pursuant to subsection 1 of this section a sticker or sign bearing the
words "PERMIT DRIVER". The design and size of such sticker or sign shall be determined
by the director by regulation. Every applicant issued a temporary instruction permit and
sticker on or after January 1, 2003, may display or affix the sticker or sign on the rear window
of the motor vehicle. Such sticker or sign may be displayed on the rear window of the motor
vehicle whenever the holder of the instruction permit operates a motor vehicle during his or
her temporary permit licensure period.
8. Beginning July 1, 2005, the director shall verify that an applicant for an instruction
permit issued under this section is lawfully present in the United States before accepting the
application. The director shall not issue an instruction permit for a period that exceeds an
applicant's lawful presence in the United States. The director may establish procedures to
verify the lawful presence of the applicant and establish the duration of any permit issued
under this section.
9. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for any person holding
a temporary instruction permit issued under the provisions of this section, no violation

HB 3220 4
for which points are assessed under section 302.302 shall be reduced or amended to any
violation for which fewer or no points are assessed under section 302.302.
10. The director may adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
302.171. 1. The director shall verify that an applicant for a driver's license is a
Missouri resident or national of the United States or a noncitizen with a lawful immigration
status, and a Missouri resident before accepting the application. The director shall not issue a
driver's license for a period that exceeds the duration of an applicant's lawful immigration
status in the United States. The director may establish procedures to verify the Missouri
residency or United States naturalization or lawful immigration status and Missouri residency
of the applicant and establish the duration of any driver's license issued under this section. An
application for a license shall be made upon an approved form furnished by the director.
Every application shall state the full name, Social Security number, age, height, weight, color
of eyes, sex, residence, mailing address of the applicant, and the classification for which the
applicant has been licensed, and, if so, when and by what state, and whether or not such
license has ever been suspended, revoked, or disqualified, and, if revoked, suspended or
disqualified, the date and reason for such suspension, revocation or disqualification and
whether the applicant is making a one or more dollar donation to promote an organ donation
program as prescribed in subsection 2 of this section, to promote a blindness education,
screening and treatment program as prescribed in subsection 3 of this section, or the Missouri
medal of honor recipients fund prescribed in subsection 4 of this section. A driver's license,
nondriver's license, or instruction permit issued under this chapter shall contain the applicant's
legal name as it appears on a birth certificate or as legally changed through marriage or court
order. No name change by common usage based on common law shall be permitted. The
application shall also contain such information as the director may require to enable the
director to determine the applicant's qualification for driving a motor vehicle; and shall state
whether or not the applicant has been convicted in this or any other state for violating the laws
of this or any other state or any ordinance of any municipality, relating to driving without a
license, careless driving, or driving while intoxicated, or failing to stop after an accident and
disclosing the applicant's identity, or driving a motor vehicle without the owner's consent.
The application shall contain a certification by the applicant as to the truth of the facts stated
therein. Every person who applies for a license to operate a motor vehicle who is less than
twenty-one years of age shall be provided with educational materials relating to the hazards of
driving while intoxicated, including information on penalties imposed by law for violation of
the intoxication-related offenses of the state. Beginning January 1, 2001, if the applicant is
less than eighteen years of age, the applicant must comply with all requirements for the
issuance of an intermediate driver's license pursuant to section 302.178. For persons

HB 3220 5
mobilized and deployed with the United States Armed Forces, an application under this
subsection shall be considered satisfactory by the department of revenue if it is signed by a
person who holds general power of attorney executed by the person deployed, provided the
applicant meets all other requirements set by the director. Beginning January 1, 2027, if the
applicant is under twenty-one years of age and has never held a driver's license issued
by the state of Missouri, any other state or territory of the United States, or any foreign
country, the applicant shall successfully complete a driver's education program
approved by the Missouri highways and transportation commission.
2. An applicant for a license may make a donation of an amount not less than one
dollar to promote an organ donor program. The director of revenue shall collect the donations
and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the organ donor program
fund established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. Moneys in the organ donor program fund
shall be used solely for the purposes established in sections 194.297 to 194.304 except that
the department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs.
The donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant
for the license at the time of issuance or renewal of the license. The director shall make
available an informational booklet or other informational sources on the importance of organ
and tissue donations to applicants for licensure as designed by the organ donation advisory
committee established in sections 194.297 to 194.304. The director shall inquire of each
applicant at the time the licensee presents the completed application to the director whether
the applicant is interested in making the one or more dollar donation prescribed in this
subsection and whether the applicant is interested in inclusion in the organ donor registry and
shall also specifically inform the licensee of the ability to consent to organ donation by
placing a donor symbol sticker authorized and issued by the department of health and senior
services on the back of his or her driver's license or identification card as prescribed by
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of section 194.225. A symbol may be placed on the front of
the license or identification card indicating the applicant's desire to be listed in the registry at
the applicant's request at the time of his or her application for a driver's license or
identification card, or the applicant may instead request an organ donor sticker from the
department of health and senior services by application on the department of health and senior
services' website. Upon receipt of an organ donor sticker sent by the department of health and
senior services, the applicant shall place the sticker on the back of his or her driver's license or
identification card to indicate that he or she has made an anatomical gift. The director shall
notify the department of health and senior services of information obtained from applicants
who indicate to the director that they are interested in registry participation, and the
department of health and senior services shall enter the complete name, address, date of birth,

HB 3220 6
race, gender and a unique personal identifier in the registry established in subsection 1 of
section 194.304.
3. An applicant for a license may make a donation of one dollar to promote a
blindness education, screening and treatment program. The director of revenue shall collect
the donations and deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the blindness
education, screening and treatment program fund established in section 209.015. Moneys in
the blindness education, screening and treatment program fund shall be used solely for the
purposes established in section 209.015; except that the department of revenue shall retain no
more than one percent for its administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection
is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for the license at the time of issuance or
renewal of the license. The director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the licensee
presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant is interested in
making the one dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
4. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the Missouri
medal of honor recipients fund. The director of revenue shall collect the donations and
deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the Missouri medal of honor
recipients fund as established in section 226.925. Moneys in the medal of honor recipients
fund shall be used solely for the purposes established in section 226.925, except that the
department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its administrative costs. The
donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant for
registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The director shall inquire of each applicant at
the time the applicant presents the completed application to the director whether the applicant
is interested in making the one dollar donation prescribed in this subsection.
5. An applicant for registration may make a donation of one dollar to the
driver's education training fund. The director of revenue shall collect the donations and
deposit all such donations in the state treasury to the credit of the driver's education
training fund established under section 302.216. Moneys in the driver's education
training fund shall be used solely for the purposes established in section 302.216, except
that the department of revenue shall retain no more than one percent for its
administrative costs. The donation prescribed in this subsection is voluntary and may
100 be refused by the applicant for registration at the time of issuance or renewal. The
101 director shall inquire of each applicant at the time the applicant presents the completed
102 application to the director whether the applicant is interested in making the one-dollar
103 donation described in this subsection.
104 6. Beginning July 1, 2005, the director shall deny the driving privilege of any person
105 who commits fraud or deception during the examination process or who makes application
106 for an instruction permit, driver's license, or nondriver's license which contains or is

HB 3220 7
107 substantiated with false or fraudulent information or documentation, or who knowingly
108 conceals a material fact or otherwise commits a fraud in any such application. The period of
109 denial shall be one year from the effective date of the denial notice sent by the director. The
110 denial shall become effective ten days after the date the denial notice is mailed to the person.
111 The notice shall be mailed to the person at the last known address shown on the person's
112 driving record. The notice shall be deemed received three days after mailing unless returned
113 by the postal authorities. No such individual shall reapply for a driver's examination,
114 instruction permit, driver's license, or nondriver's license until the period of denial is
115 completed. No individual who is denied the driving privilege under this section shall be
116 eligible for a limited driving privilege issued under section 302.309.
117 [6.] 7. All appeals of denials under this section shall be made as required by section
118 302.311.
119 [7.] 8. The period of limitation for criminal prosecution under this section shall be
120 extended under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of section 556.036.
121 [8.] 9. The director may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer and
122 enforce this section. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant to the authority of this
123 section shall become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to chapter 536.
124 [9.] 10. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter that requires an applicant to
125 provide proof of Missouri residency for renewal of a noncommercial driver's license,
126 noncommercial instruction permit, or nondriver's license, an applicant who is sixty-five years
127 and older and who was previously issued a Missouri noncommercial driver's license,
128 noncommercial instruction permit, or Missouri nondriver's license is exempt from showing
129 proof of Missouri residency.
130 [10.] 11. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, for the renewal of a
131 noncommercial driver's license, noncommercial instruction permit, or nondriver's license, a
132 photocopy of an applicant's United States birth certificate along with another form of
133 identification approved by the department of revenue, including, but not limited to, United
134 States military identification or United States military discharge papers, shall constitute
135 sufficient proof of Missouri citizenship.
136 [11.] 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if an applicant does not
137 meet the requirements of subsection [9] 10 of this section and does not have the required
138 documents to prove Missouri residency, United States naturalization, or lawful immigration
139 status, the department may issue a one-year driver's license renewal. This one-time renewal
140 shall only be issued to an applicant who previously has held a Missouri noncommercial
141 driver's license, noncommercial instruction permit, or nondriver's license for a period of
142 fifteen years or more and who does not have the required documents to prove Missouri
143 residency, United States naturalization, or lawful immigration status. After the expiration of

HB 3220 8
144 the one-year period, no further renewal shall be provided without the applicant producing
145 proof of Missouri residency, United States naturalization, or lawful immigration status.
302.178. 1. Any person between the ages of sixteen and eighteen years who is
qualified to obtain a license pursuant to sections 302.010 to 302.340 may apply for, and the
director shall issue, an intermediate driver's license entitling the applicant, while having such
license in his or her possession, to operate a motor vehicle of the appropriate class upon the
highways of this state in conjunction with the requirements of this section. An intermediate
driver's license shall be readily distinguishable from a license issued to those over the age of
eighteen. All applicants for an intermediate driver's license shall:
(1) Successfully complete the examination required by section 302.173;
(2) Pay the fee required by subsection 4 of this section;
(3) Have had a temporary instruction permit issued pursuant to subsection 1 of
section 302.130 for at least a six-month period or a valid license from another state; and
(4) Have a parent, grandparent, legal guardian, or, if the applicant is a participant in a
federal residential job training program, a driving instructor employed by a federal residential
job training program, sign the application stating that the applicant has completed at least
forty hours of supervised driving experience under a temporary instruction permit issued
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 302.130, or, if the applicant is an emancipated minor, the
person over twenty-one years of age who supervised such driving. For purposes of this
section, the term "emancipated minor" means a person who is at least sixteen years of age, but
less than eighteen years of age, who:
(a) Marries with the consent of the legal custodial parent or legal guardian pursuant to
section 451.080;
(b) Has been declared emancipated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(c) Enters active duty in the Armed Forces;
(d) Has written consent to the emancipation from the custodial parent or legal
guardian; or
(e) Through employment or other means provides for such person's own food, shelter
and other cost-of-living expenses;
(5) Have had no alcohol-related enforcement contacts as defined in section 302.525
during the preceding twelve months; and
(6) Have no nonalcoholic traffic convictions for which points are assessed pursuant to
section 302.302, within the preceding six months.
2. An intermediate driver's license grants the licensee the same privileges to operate
that classification of motor vehicle as a license issued pursuant to section 302.177, except that
no person shall operate a motor vehicle on the highways of this state under such an
intermediate driver's license between the hours of 1:00 a.m. and 5:00 a.m. unless

HB 3220 9
accompanied by a person described in subsection 1 of section 302.130; except the licensee
may operate a motor vehicle without being accompanied if the travel is to or from a school or
educational program or activity, a regular place of employment or in emergency situations as
defined by the director by regulation.
3. Each intermediate driver's license shall be restricted by requiring that the driver
and all passengers in the licensee's vehicle wear safety belts at all times. This safety belt
restriction shall not apply to a person operating a motorcycle. For the first six months after
issuance of the intermediate driver's license, the holder of the license shall not operate a motor
vehicle with more than one passenger who is under the age of nineteen who is not a member
of the holder's immediate family. As used in this subsection, an intermediate driver's license
holder's immediate family shall include brothers, sisters, stepbrothers or stepsisters of the
driver, including adopted or foster children residing in the same household of the intermediate
driver's license holder. After the expiration of the first six months, the holder of an
intermediate driver's license shall not operate a motor vehicle with more than three passengers
who are under nineteen years of age and who are not members of the holder's immediate
family. The passenger restrictions of this subsection shall not be applicable to any
intermediate driver's license holder who is operating a motor vehicle being used in
agricultural work-related activities.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 302.177 to the contrary, the fee for an
intermediate driver's license shall be [five] ten dollars and such license shall be valid for a
period of two years.
5. [Any intermediate driver's licensee accumulating six or more points in a twelve-
month period may be required to participate in and successfully complete a driver-
improvement program approved by the state highways and transportation commission. The
driver-improvement program ordered by the director of revenue shall not be used in lieu of
point assessment] Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for any person
holding an intermediate driver's license issued under the provisions of this section, no
violation for which points are assessed under section 302.302 shall be reduced or
amended to any violation for which fewer or no points are assessed under section
302.302.
6. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the license of any
intermediate driver's licensee who has accumulated more than two non-alcohol-related
violations or who has accumulated six or more points for any driving violations shall be
converted to a temporary learner's permit and shall be subject to the restrictions of
section 302.130, provided that the licensee is given the opportunity to participate in an
administrative hearing where he or she may contest any such convictions or assessment
of points. Such administrative hearing shall be held within fifteen days of the offense

HB 3220 10
triggering the intermediate driver's license conversion. A person's intermediate driver's
license may be reinstated upon demonstration that the person has completed any
alcohol-related rehabilitation ordered by the court and has completed a driver's
education program approved by the state highways and transportation commission that
includes at least forty hours of supervised driving experience.
(2) Whenever a violation by an intermediate driver's licensee involves alcohol,
the provisions of section 302.520 shall apply.
(3) Whenever a violation by an intermediate driver's licensee constitutes an
offense for which twelve points are assessed under section 302.302, the provisions of
subsection 7 of section 302.304 shall apply.
[6.] 7. (1) An intermediate driver's licensee who has, for the preceding twelve-month
period, had no alcohol-related enforcement contacts, as defined in section 302.525 and no
traffic convictions for which points are assessed, upon reaching the age of eighteen years or
within the thirty days immediately preceding their eighteenth birthday may apply for and
receive without further examination, other than a vision test as prescribed by section 302.173,
a license issued pursuant to this chapter granting [full] adult driving privileges. Such person
shall pay the required fee for such license as prescribed in section 302.177.
(2) If an intermediate driver's license expires on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday,
such license shall remain valid for the five business days immediately following the
expiration date. In no case shall a licensee whose intermediate driver's license expires on a
Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday be guilty of an offense of driving with an expired or invalid
driver's license if such offense occurred within five business days immediately following an
expiration date that occurs on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.
(3) The director of revenue shall deny an application for [a full] an adult driver's
license until the person has had no traffic convictions for which points are assessed for a
period of twelve months prior to the date of application for license or until the person is
eligible to apply for a six-year driver's license as provided for in section 302.177, provided
100 the applicant is otherwise eligible for [full] adult driving privileges. An intermediate driver's
101 license shall expire when the licensee is eligible and receives [a full] an adult driver's license
102 as prescribed in subdivision (1) of this section.
103 [7.] 8. No person upon reaching the age of eighteen years whose intermediate driver's
104 license and driving privilege is denied, suspended, cancelled or revoked in this state or any
105 other state for any reason may apply for [a full] an adult driver's license until such license or
106 driving privilege is fully reinstated. Any such person whose intermediate driver's license has
107 been revoked pursuant to the provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.540 shall, upon receipt of
108 reinstatement of the revocation from the director, pass the complete driver examination, apply

HB 3220 11
109 for a new license, and pay the proper fee before again operating a motor vehicle upon the
110 highways of this state.
111 [8.] 9. A person shall be exempt from the intermediate licensing requirements if the
112 person has reached the age of eighteen years and meets all other licensing requirements.
113 [9. Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section relating to
114 intermediate drivers' licenses or the provisions of section 302.130 relating to temporary
115 instruction permits is guilty of an infraction, and no points shall be assessed to his or her
116 driving record for any such violation.]
117 10. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
118 created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
119 with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
120 This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
121 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
122 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
123 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2000, shall be invalid
124 and void.
302.212. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
beginning January 1, 2027, every applicant for a driver's license or an intermediate
driver's license who is under twenty-one years of age and has never held a driver's
license issued by the state of Missouri, any other state or territory of the United States,
or any foreign country shall successfully complete a driver's education program
approved by the Missouri highways and transportation commission.
2. Beginning January 1, 2027, no application for a driver's license or an
intermediate driver's license shall be accepted from any person who has never held a
driver's license issued by the state of Missouri, any other state or territory of the United
States, or any foreign country unless there is also submitted with the application, on a
form approved by the department of revenue, written evidence of successful completion
by the applicant of a driver's education program approved by the Missouri highways
and transportation commission as provided under section 302.214, that was completed
not more than ninety days prior to the date of the application.
3. The educational requirements of this section shall be in addition to the
licensing requirements for an intermediate driver's license under section 302.178.
302.214. 1. The department of transportation shall enter into agreements with
public or private institutions or organizations to provide driver's education programs
free of charge to persons who are under twenty-one years of age and have never held a
driver's license issued by the state of Missouri, any other state or territory of the United

HB 3220 12
States, or any foreign country. Moneys for such contracts shall be allocated from the
driver's education and training fund established under section 302.216.
2. Prior to August 1, 2027, the Missouri highways and transportation
commission shall establish a process for certification and approval of public or
private institutions or organizations offering private driving instruction, including a
process for instructor certification. The commission shall maintain a list of approved
entities.
3. In order to qualify for certification by the Missouri highways and
transportation commission, an entity's program of instruction shall meet or exceed
the most current American Driver and Traffic Safety Education Association's Novice
Driver Education Curriculum Standards for classroom and behind-the-wheel
instruction. Program instruction shall include, per student, a minimum of six hours
of driving simulation instruction under the supervision and direction of an instructor
and six hours of behind-the-wheel operation under the supervision and direction of an
instructor.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 3 of this section, a public school district approved
to provide driver's education under the provisions of this section may petition the
highways and transportation commission for a waiver of the behind-the-wheel
instruction requirement due to inadequate funding in the district to support behind-
the-wheel training or due to the lack of availability of private, certified, and approved
driving schools within a reasonable distance. Any school district awarded such a waiver
shall be required to increase its per-student driving simulation instruction to twelve
hours.
5. Upon certification by the commission, a driver's education program shall be
placed on the approved driver's education list compiled by the Missouri highways and
transportation commission and submitted to the department of revenue. A student's
successful completion of an approved driver's education course shall satisfy the driver's
education licensing requirement established under section 302.212.
6. The department of transportation may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.

HB 3220 13
302.216. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Driver's
Education Training Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected pursuant to
appropriations of the general assembly, federal grants, private donations, and other
moneys designated for driver's education programs established under section 302.214.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and moneys in this fund shall be used solely by the Missouri highways
and transportation commission for the purposes of funding driver's education programs
established under section 302.214.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. The department of transportation shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations to establish a procedure for allocation of funds under this section. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
302.302. 1. The director of revenue shall put into effect a point system for the
suspension and revocation of licenses. Points shall be assessed only after a conviction or
forfeiture of collateral. The initial point value is as follows:
(1) Any moving violation of a state law or county or
municipal or federal traffic ordinance or regulation
not listed in this section, other than a [violation of
vehicle equipment provisions or a] court-ordered
supervision as provided in section 302.303 2 points
(except any violation of municipal stop sign
ordinance where no accident is involved 1 point)
(2) Speeding

HB 3220 14
In violation of a state law 3 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance 2 points
(3) Leaving the scene of an accident in violation of
section 577.060 12 points
[6] 12
In violation of any county or municipal ordinance points
(4) Careless and imprudent driving in violation of
subsection 4 of section 304.016 4 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance 2 points
(5) Operating without a valid license in violation of
subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of section
302.020:
(a) For the first conviction 2 points
(b) For the second conviction 4 points
(c) For the third conviction 6 points
(6) Operating with a suspended or revoked license prior
to restoration of operating privileges 12 points
(7) Obtaining a license by misrepresentation 12 points
(8) For the first conviction of driving while in an
intoxicated condition or under the influence of
controlled substances or drugs 8 points
(9) For the second or subsequent conviction of any of
the following offenses however combined: driving
while in an intoxicated condition, driving under the
influence of controlled substances or drugs or
driving with a blood alcohol content of eight-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight 12 points
(10) For the first conviction for driving with blood
alcohol content eight-hundredths of one percent or
more by weight
In violation of state law 8 points
In violation of a county or municipal ordinance or
federal law or regulation 8 points
(11) Any felony involving the use of a motor vehicle 12 points

HB 3220 15
(12) Knowingly permitting unlicensed operator to
operate a motor vehicle 4 points
(13) For a conviction for failure to maintain financial
responsibility pursuant to county or municipal
ordinance or pursuant to section 303.025 4 points
(14) Endangerment of a highway worker in violation of
section 304.585 4 points
(15) Aggravated endangerment of a highway worker in
violation of section 304.585 12 points
(16) For a conviction of violating a municipal ordinance
that prohibits tow truck operators from stopping at
or proceeding to the scene of an accident unless they
have been requested to stop or proceed to such
scene by a party involved in such accident or by an
officer of a public safety agency 4 points
(17) Endangerment of an emergency responder in
violation of section 304.894 4 points
(18) Aggravated endangerment of an emergency
responder in violation of section 304.894 12 points
2. The director shall, as provided in subdivision (5) of subsection 1 of this section,
assess an operator points for a conviction pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
section 302.020, when the director issues such operator a license or permit pursuant to the
provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.340.
3. An additional two points shall be assessed when personal injury or property
damage results from any violation listed in subdivisions (1) to (13) of subsection 1 of this
section and if found to be warranted and certified by the reporting court. Twelve points shall
be assessed automatically when serious injury or death results from any violation listed
in subdivisions (1) to (18) of subsection 1 of this section and if found to be warranted and
certified by the reporting court.
4. When any of the acts listed in subdivision (2), (3), (4) or (8) of subsection 1 of this
section constitutes both a violation of a state law and a violation of a county or municipal
ordinance, points [may] shall be assessed for [either] the highest violation but not for both.
Notwithstanding that an offense arising out of the same occurrence could be construed to be a
violation of subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of subsection 1 of this section, no person shall be
tried or convicted for more than one offense pursuant to subdivisions (8), (9) and (10) of
subsection 1 of this section for offenses arising out of the same occurrence.

HB 3220 16
5. The director of revenue shall put into effect a system for staying the assessment of
partial points against an operator. The system shall provide that the satisfactory completion
of a driver-improvement program or, in the case of violations committed while operating a
motorcycle, a motorcycle-rider training course approved by the state highways and
transportation commission, by an operator, when so ordered and verified by any court
having jurisdiction over any law of this state or county or municipal ordinance, regulating
motor vehicles, other than a violation committed in a commercial motor vehicle as defined in
section 302.700 or a violation committed by an individual who has been issued a commercial
driver's license or is required to obtain a commercial driver's license in this state or any other
state, shall be accepted by the director in lieu of the assessment of partial points for a
violation pursuant to subdivision (1), (2) or (4) of subsection 1 of this section or pursuant to
subsection 3 of this section. The operator shall be given the option to complete the driver-
improvement program through [an] a proctored online or in-person course. A court using a
centralized violation bureau established under section 476.385 [may] shall elect to have the
bureau order and verify completion of a driver-improvement program or motorcycle-rider
training course as prescribed by order of the court. For the purposes of this subsection, the
driver-improvement program shall meet or exceed the standards of the National Safety
Council's eight-hour "Defensive Driving Course" or, in the case of a violation which occurred
100 during the operation of a motorcycle, the program shall meet the standards established by the
101 state highways and transportation commission pursuant to sections 302.133 to 302.137. The
102 completion of a driver-improvement program or a motorcycle-rider training course shall not
103 be accepted in lieu of points more than one time in any thirty-six-month period and shall be
104 completed within sixty days of the date of conviction in order to be accepted in lieu of the
105 assessment of partial points. Every court having jurisdiction pursuant to the provisions of
106 this subsection shall, within fifteen days after completion of the driver-improvement program
107 or motorcycle-rider training course by an operator, forward a record of the completion to the
108 director, all other provisions of the law to the contrary notwithstanding. The director shall
109 establish procedures for record keeping and the administration of this subsection.
110 6. The director of revenue shall put into effect a system for reinstating, with a
111 partial reduction of points, licenses that were converted to temporary learner's permits
112 as provided under subsection 6 of section 302.178. The system shall provide that the
113 satisfactory completion of a driver-improvement program shall waive a portion of the
114 original points assessed.
115 7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no violation for which
116 points are assessed under this section shall be reduced or amended to any violation for
117 which fewer or no points are assessed under this section for:
118 (1) Any person under twenty-one years of age; or

HB 3220 17
119 (2) Any person, regardless of age, who was granted adult driver's license
120 privileges under section 302.178 and who has held such adult license for fewer than
121 thirty-six consecutive months without a violation for which points are assessed.
✔